Alabama, session 2026rs, HB205.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. (a) The Southeast Alabama Human Development
Council, established pursuant to Section 45-34-83, Code of
Alabama 1975, is abolished.
(b) Pursuant to the provisions of Chapter 1 of Title
44, Code of Alabama 1975, the Alabama Department of Youth
Services shall assume the duties of the council.
Section 2. Section 45-34-83, Code of Alabama 1975,
establishing the Southeast Alabama Human Development Council,
is repealed.
Section 3. This act shall become effective on June 1,
2026.
Page 1

2026.
HB205 Enrolled










________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives



________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate


House of Representatives

I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
was passed by the House 20-Jan-26.

John Treadwell
Clerk





Senate 22-Jan-26 Passed



Page 2